Illinois, session 104th, HB574.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Statute on Statutes is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 70/1)  (from Ch. 1, par. 1001)7    Sec. 1. In the the construction of statutes, this Act 8shall be observed, unless such construction would be 9inconsistent with the manifest intent of the General Assembly 10or repugnant to the context of the statute.11(Source: P.A. 86-451.)